en: Bag embellishment: Beaded; Crystal/Jeweled; Embroidered; Fringe; Plain; Printed; Quilted; Sequined; Studded; Tassel; Other
el: Διακόσμηση τσάντας: Με χάντρες; Με κρύσταλλα/πετράδια; Κεντητό; Κρόσσια; Σκέτο; Εμπριμέ; Καπιτονέ; Με πούλιες; Με τρουκς; Φούντα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Krepšio dekoratyviniai elementai: Su karoliukais; Su kristalais / brangakmeniais; Išsiuvinėta; Su kutais; Be papuošimų; Su spauda; Dygsniuota; Su žvyneliais; Su kniedėmis; Su kutu; Kita
it: Decorazione per borsa: Con perline; Con cristalli/gioielli; Ricamato; Con frange; Tinta unita; Stampato; Trapuntato; Con paillettes; Con borchie; Con nappine; Altro
sl-SI: Okrasitev torbe: S perlicami; S kristali/okrasnimi kamni; Vezeno; Z resicami; Brez okrasja; Tiskano; Prešito; Z bleščicami; Z zakovicami; S čopki; Drugo
sk-SK: Ozdoba tašky: S korálkami; S kryštálmi/šperkami; Vyšívané; Strapce; Bez zdobenia; S potlačou; Prešívané; S flitrami; S cvokmi; Strapce; Iné
pt-PT: Enfeite de saco: Com contas; Com cristais/joias; Bordado; Franjas; Liso; Estampado; Acolchoado; Com lantejoulas; Com tachas; Borla; Outro
bg-BG: Украса на чанта: С мъниста; С кристали/бижута; С бродерия; С ресни; Изчистена; С принт; Капитонирана; С пайети; С капси; С пискюл; Друго
fi: Laukun koristelu: Helmikoristeltu; Kristalli-/jalokivikoristeltu; Brodeerattu; Hapsut; Koristelematon; Painettu; Tikattu; Paljettikoristeltu; Niittikoristeltu; Tupsut; Muu
tr: Çanta süsleme detayı: Boncuklu; Kristal/Mücevherli; Nakışlı; Püsküllü; Düz; Baskılı; Kapitone; Pullu; Zımbalı; Püskül; Diğer
vi: Trang trí túi: Đính hạt; Pha lê/Đính đá; Thêu; Tua rua; Trơn; In họa tiết; Chần bông; Đính sequin; Đính đinh tán; Quả tua rua; Khác
ru: Декор сумки: С бисером; Со стразами/кристаллами; С вышивкой; С бахромой; Без отделки; С принтом; Стеганый; С пайетками; С заклепками; С кисточками; Другое
da: Taskeudsmykning: Perlebesat; Krystaller/juveler; Broderet; Frynser; Enkel; Med print; Quiltet; Med pailletter; Nittebesat; Kvast; Andet
hr-HR: Ukrasi na torbi: S perlicama; S kristalima / draguljima; Izvezeno; Resice; Obično; S printom; Prošiveno; Sa šljokicama; Sa zakovicama; S kićankom; Ostalo
cs: Ozdobné prvky tašky: S korálky; S krystaly/šperky; Vyšívané; S třásněmi; Bez zdobení; S potiskem; Prošívané; S flitry; S cvočky; Se střapci; Jiné
ja: バッグの装飾: ビーズ; クリスタル/ジュエル; 刺繍; フリンジ; プレーン; プリント; キルティング; スパンコール; スタッズ; タッセル; その他
es: Adorno del bolso: Con cuentas; Cristal/joyas; Bordado; Flecos; Liso; Estampado; Acolchado; Con lentejuelas; Con tachuelas; Borla; Otro
nb: Veskeutsmykning: Perlet; Krystall/juveler; Brodert; Frynser; Enkel; Trykt; Vattert; Paljetter; Naglet; Dusk; Annet
nl: Tasversiering: Met kralen; Met kristallen/sierstenen; Geborduurd; Franjes; Effen; Bedrukt; Doorgestikt; Met pailletten; Met studs; Kwastjes; Overig
pt-BR: Enfeite da bolsa: Com miçangas; Com cristais/joias; Bordado; Franja; Liso; Estampado; Acolchoado; Com lantejoulas; Com tachas; Com tassel; Outro
hu: Táska díszítése: Gyöngyös; Kristályos/Ékköves; Hímzett; Rojtos; Díszítetlen; Nyomtatott; Steppelt; Flitteres; Szegecses; Bojtos; Egyéb
zh-CN: 包袋装饰: 串珠; 水晶/镶钻; 刺绣; 流苏; 纯色; 印花; 绗缝; 亮片; 镶钉; 穗饰; 其他
fr: Ornement de sac: Perlé; Cristaux/bijoux; Brodé; À franges; Uni; Imprimé; Matelassé; À paillettes; Clouté; À pampilles; Autre
ro-RO: Ornamente pentru geantă: Cu mărgele; Cu cristale/bijuterii; Brodat; Franjuri; Simplu; Imprimat; Matlasat; Cu paiete; Cu ținte; Ciucure; Altele
ko: 가방 장식: 비즈; 크리스탈/보석 장식; 자수; 프린지; 무지; 프린트; 누빔; 스팽글; 스터드 장식; 태슬; 기타
de: Taschenverzierung: Perlenbesetzt; Kristall-/Schmuckbesetzt; Bestickt; Fransen; Schlicht; Bedruckt; Gesteppt; Mit Pailletten; Nietenbesetzt; Quasten; Sonstige
th: การตกแต่งกระเป๋า: ประดับลูกปัด; ประดับคริสตัล/อัญมณี; ปักลาย; แต่งพู่; เรียบๆ; พิมพ์ลาย; บุนวม; ประดับเลื่อม; ตอกหมุด; ห้อยพู่; อื่นๆ
pl: Ozdoby torby: Z koralikami; Wysadzana kryształkami/kamieniami; Haftowana; Z frędzlami; Gładka; Z nadrukiem; Pikowana; Z cekinami; Z ćwiekami; Z chwostem; Inne
sv: Väskutsmyckning: Pärlbesatt; Kristall/smyckad; Broderad; Frans; Slät; Tryckt; Quiltad; Paljettbesatt; Nitad; Tofs; Övrigt
zh-TW: 包袋裝飾: 串珠; 水晶/珠寶; 刺繡; 流蘇; 素面; 印花; 絎縫; 亮片; 飾釘; 穗飾; 其他